Utah statutes.
59-1-301.   Payment under protest -- Action to recover.

In all cases of levy of taxes, licenses, or other demands for public revenue which is deemed unlawful by the party whose property is taxed, or from whom the tax or license is demanded or enforced, that party may pay under protest the tax or license, or any part deemed unlawful, to the officers designated and authorized by law to collect the tax or license; and then the party so paying or a legal representative may bring an action in the tax division of the appropriate district court against the officer to whom the tax or license was paid, or against the state, county, municipality, or other taxing entity on whose behalf it was collected, to recover the tax or license or any portion of the tax or license paid under protest.



Enacted by Chapter 3, 1988 General Session

